Utah statutes.
54-4-2.   Investigations -- Hearings and notice -- Findings.

(1)  Whenever the commission believes that in order to secure a compliance with the provisions of this title or with the orders of the commission, or that it will be otherwise in the interest of the public, an investigation should be made of any act or omission to act, or of anything accomplished or proposed, or of any schedule, classification, rate, price, charge, fare, toll, rental, rule, regulation, service or facility of any public utility, it shall investigate the same upon its own motion, and may fix a time and place for a hearing thereof with notice to the public utility concerning which such investigation shall be made, and upon such hearing shall make such findings and orders as shall be just and reasonable with respect to any such matter.

(2)  This chapter does not apply to a schedule, classification, rate, price, charge, fare, toll, rental, rule, service, facility, or contract of a public utility or electrical corporation furnishing electricity, if the electricity is consumed by an owner, lessor, or interest holder or by an affiliate of an owner, lessor, or interest holder, who has provided at least $25,000,000 in value, including credit support, relating to the electric plant furnishing the electricity and whose consumption does not exceed its long-term entitlement in the plant under a long-term arrangement other than a power purchase agreement, except a power purchase agreement with an electrical corporation.



Amended by Chapter 390, 2010 General Session

